Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.440

Public office. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county, city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other state political subdivision elective office.

[ 2024 c 164 s 244.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.